Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.110

Disability retirement—Criminal conduct.

A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.35.440 or 41.35.690 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

[ 1998 c 341 s 12.]